files/SerbianStemmer.sbl
            'astu'          (<-'ast')
            'kijemu'
            'kijima'
            'kijega'
            'kijeg'
            'kijem'
            'kemu'
            'kega'
            'keg'
            'kem'
            'kijim'
            'kijih'
            'kijoj'
            'koga'
            'kome'
            'komu'
            'kima'
            'kiji'
            'kije'
            'kija'
            'kiju'
            'kim'
            'kih'
            'koj'
            'kom'
            'kog'
            'kov'
            'ki'
            'ka'
            'ku'
            'ke'
            'ko'            (<-'k')
            'evaju{cy}i'
            'evasmo'
            'evaste'
            'evajmo'
            'evajte'
            'evaju'
            'evala'
            'evale'
            'evali'
            'evalo'
            'evamo'
            'evana'
            'evane'
            'evani'
            'evano'
            'evate'
            'evati'
            'eva{sx}e'
            'evahu'
            'evah'
            'evaj'
            'evam'
            'evan'
            'evao'
            'evat'
            'evav'
            'eva{sx}'       (<-'eva')
            'avaju{cy}i'
            'avasmo'
            'avaste'
            'avajmo'
            'avajte'
            'avaju'
            'avala'
            'avale'
            'avali'
            'avalo'
            'avamo'
            'avana'
            'avane'
            'avani'
            'avano'
            'avate'
            'avati'
            'ava{sx}e'
            'avahu'
            'avah'
            'avaj'
            'avam'
            'avan'
            'avao'
            'avat'
            'avav'
            'ava{sx}'       (<-'ava')
            'ivaju{cy}i'
            'ivasmo'
            'ivaste'
            'ivajmo'
            'ivajte'
            'ivaju'
            'ivala'
            'ivale'
            'ivali'
            'ivalo'
            'ivamo'
            'ivana'
            'ivane'
            'ivani'
            'ivano'
            'ivate'
            'ivati'
            'iva{sx}e'
            'ivahu'
            'ivah'
            'ivaj'
            'ivam'
            'ivan'
            'ivao'
            'ivat'
            'ivav'
            'iva{sx}'       (<-'iva')
            'uvaju{cy}i'
            'uvasmo'
            'uvaste'
            'uvajmo'
            'uvajte'
            'uvaju'
            'uvala'
            'uvale'
            'uvali'
            'uvalo'
            'uvamo'
            'uvana'
            'uvane'
            'uvani'
            'uvano'
            'uvate'
            'uvati'
            'uva{sx}e'
            'uvahu'
            'uvah'
            'uvaj'
            'uvam'
            'uvan'
            'uvao'
            'uvat'
            'uvav'
            'uva{sx}'       (<-'uva')
            'irujemo'
            'irujete'
            'iruju{cy}i'
            'iraju{cy}i'
            'irivat'
            'irujem'
            'iruje{sx}'
            'irujmo'
            'irujte'
            'irav{sx}i'
            'irasmo'
            'iraste'
            'irati'
            'iramo'
            'irate'
            'iraju'
            'ira{sx}e'
            'irahu'
            'irala'
            'iralo'
            'irali'
            'irale'
            'iruje'
            'iruju'
            'iruj'
            'iral'
            'iran'
            'iram'
            'ira{sx}'
            'irat'
            'irah'
            'irao'          (<-'ir')
            'a{cx}ismo'
            'a{cx}iste'
            'a{cx}iti'
            'a{cx}imo'
            'a{cx}ite'
            'a{cx}i{sx}e'
            'a{cx}e{cy}i'
            'a{cx}ila'
            'a{cx}ilo'
            'a{cx}ili'
            'a{cx}ile'
            'a{cx}ena'
            'a{cx}eno'
            'a{cx}eni'
            'a{cx}ene'
            'a{cx}io'
            'a{cx}im'
            'a{cx}i{sx}'
            'a{cx}it'
            'a{cx}ih'
            'a{cx}en'
            'a{cx}i'
            'a{cx}e'        (<-'a{cx}')
            'a{cx}av{sx}i'
            'a{cx}asmo'
            'a{cx}aste'
            'a{cx}ahu'
            'a{cx}ati'
            'a{cx}amo'
            'a{cx}ate'
            'a{cx}a{sx}e'
            'a{cx}ala'
            'a{cx}alo'
            'a{cx}ali'
            'a{cx}ale'
            'a{cx}aju'
            'a{cx}ana'
            'a{cx}ano'
            'a{cx}ani'
            'a{cx}ane'
            'a{cx}ao'
            'a{cx}am'
            'a{cx}a{sx}'
            'a{cx}at'
            'a{cx}ah'
            'a{cx}an'       (<-'a{cx}a')
            'nuv{sx}i'
            'nusmo'
            'nuste'
            'nu{cy}i'
            'nimo'
            'nite'
            'nemo'
            'nete'
            'nula'
            'nulo'
            'nule'
            'nuli'
            'nuto'
            'nuti'
            'nuta'
            'ne{sx}'
            'nuo'
            'nut'           (<-'n')
            'niv{sx}i'
            'nismo'
            'niste'
            'niti'
            'nila'
            'nilo'
            'nile'
            'nili'
            'ni{sx}'
            'nio'           (<-'ni')
            'aju{cy}i'
            'av{sx}i'
            'asmo'
            'ajmo'
            'ajte'
            'ajem'
            'aloj'
            'amo'
            'ate'
            'aje'
            'aju'
            'ati'
            'a{sx}e'
            'ahu'
            'ala'
            'ali'
            'ale'
            'alo'
            'ano'
            'at'
            'ah'
            'ao'
            'aj'
            'an'
            'am'
            'a{sx}'         (<-'a')
            'uraju{cy}i'
            'urasmo'
            'uraste'
            'urajmo'
            'urajte'
            'uramo'
            'urate'
            'uraju'
            'urati'
            'ura{sx}e'
            'urahu'
            'urala'
            'urali'
            'urale'
            'uralo'
            'urana'
            'urano'
            'urani'
            'urane'
            'ural'
            'urat'
            'urah'
            'urao'
            'uraj'
            'uran'
            'uram'
            'ura{sx}'       (<-'ur')
            'astajasmo'
            'astajaste'
            'astajahu'
            'astajati'
            'astajemo'
            'astajete'
            'astaja{sx}e'
            'astajali'
            'astaju{cy}i'
            'astajala'
            'astajalo'
            'astajale'
            'astajmo'
            'astajao'
            'astajem'
            'astaje{sx}'
            'astajat'
            'astajah'
            'astajte'
            'astaje'
            'astaju'        (<-'astaj')
            'istajasmo'
            'istajaste'
            'istajahu'
            'istajati'
            'istajemo'
            'istajete'
            'istaja{sx}e'
            'istajali'
            'istaju{cy}i'
            'istajala'
            'istajalo'
            'istajale'
            'istajmo'
            'istajao'
            'istajem'
            'istaje{sx}'
            'istajat'
            'istajah'
            'istajte'
            'istaje'
            'istaju'        (<-'istaj')
            'ostajasmo'
            'ostajaste'
            'ostajahu'
            'ostajati'
            'ostajemo'
            'ostajete'
            'ostaja{sx}e'
            'ostajali'
            'ostaju{cy}i'
            'ostajala'
            'ostajalo'
            'ostajale'
            'ostajmo'
            'ostajao'
            'ostajem'
            'ostaje{sx}'
            'ostajat'
            'ostajah'
            'ostajte'
            'ostaje'
            'ostaju'        (<-'ostaj')
            'alama'
            'alima'
            'alom'
            'alu'
            'al'            (<-'a')
            'ajevima'
            'ajevi'
            'ajeva'
            'ajeve'
            'ajama'
            'ajima'
            'aja'
            'aji'           (<-'aj')
            'astadosmo'
            'astadoste'
            'astado{sx}e'
            'astanemo'
            'astademo'
            'astanete'
            'astadete'
            'astanimo'
            'astanite'
            'astanila'
            'astav{sx}i'
            'astanem'
            'astadem'
            'astane{sx}'
            'astade{sx}'
            'astadoh'
            'astade'
            'astati'
            'astane'
            'astanu'
            'astadu'
            'astala'
            'astali'
            'astalo'
            'astale'
            'astat'
            'astao'         (<-'asta')
            'istadosmo'
            'istadoste'
            'istado{sx}e'
            'istanemo'
            'istademo'
            'istanete'
            'istadete'
            'istanimo'
            'istanite'
            'istanila'
            'istav{sx}i'
            'istanem'
            'istadem'
            'istane{sx}'
            'istade{sx}'
            'istadoh'
            'istade'
            'istati'
            'istane'
            'istanu'
            'istadu'
            'istala'
            'istali'
            'istalo'
            'istale'
            'istat'
            'istao'         (<-'ista')
            'ostadosmo'
            'ostadoste'
            'ostado{sx}e'
            'ostanemo'
            'ostademo'
            'ostanete'
            'ostadete'
            'ostanimo'
            'ostanite'
            'ostanila'
            'ostav{sx}i'
            'ostanem'
            'ostadem'
            'ostane{sx}'
            'ostade{sx}'
            'ostadoh'
            'ostade'
            'ostati'
            'ostane'
            'ostanu'
            'ostadu'
            'ostala'
            'ostali'
            'ostalo'
            'ostale'
            'ostat'
            'ostao'         (<-'osta')
            'tasmo'
            'taste'
            'tajmo'
            'tajte'
            'tav{sx}i'
            'tati'
            'tamo'
            'tate'
            'taju'
            'tala'
            'talo'
            'tale'
            'tali'
            'tana'
            'tano'
            'tani'
            'tane'
            'tan'
            'taj'
            'tao'
            'tam'
            'ta{sx}'
            'tat'
            'tah'           (<-'ta')
            'injasmo'
            'injaste'
            'injati'
            'injemo'
            'injete'
            'injali'
            'injala'
            'injalo'
            'injale'
            'inja{sx}e'
            'injahu'
            'injem'
            'inje{sx}'
            'injat'
            'injah'
            'injao'         (<-'inj')
            'astemo'
            'astete'
            'astimo'
            'astite'
            'astu{cy}i'
            'aste{sx}'
            'asli'
            'asla'
            'aslo'
            'asle'          (<-'as')
            'iv{sx}i'
            'ie{cy}i'
            'ismo'
            'imo'
            'ite'
            'iti'
            'ili'
            'ila'
            'ilo'
            'ile'
            'im'
            'i{sx}'
            'it'
            'ih'
            'io'            (<-'i')
            'ijemo'
            'ijete'
            'ijem'
            'ije{sx}'
            'ijmo'
            'ijte'
            'iju'
            'ije'
            'ij'
            'ilu'           (<-'i')
            'lu{cx}ujete'
            'lu{cx}uju{cy}i'
            'lu{cx}ujemo'
            'lu{cx}ujem'
            'lu{cx}uje{sx}'
            'lu{cx}ismo'
            'lu{cx}iste'
            'lu{cx}ujmo'
            'lu{cx}ujte'
            'lu{cx}uje'
            'lu{cx}uju'
            'lu{cx}i{sx}e'
            'lu{cx}iti'
            'lu{cx}imo'
            'lu{cx}ite'
            'lu{cx}ila'
            'lu{cx}ilo'
